California, session 20252026, SB1304.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2860 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2860. (a) This chapter confers no authority to practice medicine or surgery, to provide respiratory care services and treatment, or to undertake the prevention, treatment, or cure of disease, pain, injury, deformity, or mental or physical condition in violation of any provision of law.(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensed vocational nurse who has received training and who demonstrates competency satisfactory to their employer may, when directed by a physician and surgeon, perform respiratory tasks and services expressly identified by the Respiratory Care Board of California pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3702.5.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a licensed vocational nurse may perform the respiratory tasks and services as authorized under paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 3765.(c) Notwithstanding any other law except subdivision (a) of Section 2859, the practice of vocational nursing includes all of the following:(1) Oral suctioning performed within the oral cavity that does not enter the oropharynx or beyond.(2) Nasal suctioning performed within the nasal cavity that does not enter the nasopharynx or beyond.(3) Tracheostomy tube suctioning when the suctioning device remains within the tracheostomy tube and does not pass beyond the distal end of the tube.(4) Removal and replacement of an external speaking valve for purposes of suctioning the tracheostomy tube.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 3710 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3710. (a) The Respiratory Care Board of California, hereafter referred to as the board, shall enforce and administer this chapter.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 3716 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3716. (a) The board may employ an executive officer exempt from civil service and, subject to the provisions of law relating to civil service, clerical assistants and, except as provided in Section 159.5, other employees as it may deem necessary to carry out its powers and duties.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 3735 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3735. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an applicant shall not receive a license under this chapter without first successfully passing the National Board for Respiratory Care’s Respiratory Therapy Examination, at the cut-off level required to qualify for the Registered Respiratory Therapist credential, or any succeeding examinations.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person applying for licensure who provides evidence that they passed the national Certified Respiratory Therapist Examination or Written Registry Examination before January 1, 2015, shall be deemed to have met the examination requirement of subdivision (a), provided there is no evidence of prior license or job-related discipline, as determined by the board in its discretion.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 3752.8 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:3752.8. (a) The board shall suspend a license under the following conditions:(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board or its designee shall automatically suspend a license following a conviction of a felony by a licensee, where the conviction involves a violation of one or more of the sections identified in subdivision (b), whether in the course of the licensee’s practice as a respiratory care practitioner or otherwise.(2) The suspension shall remain in effect until the time for appeal has elapsed, if no appeal has been taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the board.(3) The board or its designee may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the best interest of justice to do so, with due regard being given to maintaining the integrity of, and confidence in, the profession.(b) The offenses subject to this section include all of the following:(1) A violation of Section 726.(2) An offense described in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.(3) A serious felony, as defined in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.(c) The board shall revoke a license under the following conditions:(1) Following the conviction of a felony, as described in subdivision (b), the board or its designee shall automatically revoke a license at the time that the appeal has elapsed with no appeal having been taken, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, the judgment of conviction has otherwise become final.(2) If the related conviction of the licensee is overturned on appeal, no revocation order shall be issued as to that conviction, and any suspension order issued pursuant to the above shall be rescinded, unless that order is based on a stipulated settlement. This subdivision shall not prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction, including, but not limited to, the underlying conduct alleged in the criminal case.(d) (1) A licensee subject to suspension or revocation under this section may request a hearing within 30 days of the automatic suspension order described in subdivision (a) and the automatic revocation order described in subdivision (c). The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the conviction of any felony identified in subdivision (b) is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner. An administrative law judge shall not permit or give any weight to expert testimony regarding whether the conviction is substantially related to the practice of respiratory care. The only purpose of an administrative hearing shall be to determine whether the discipline imposed shall be a suspension, revocation, or other action under the circumstances of the case.(e) This section does not limit the board’s authority to pursue disciplinary action under any other provision of this chapter, including, but not limited to, Sections 3750, 3750.5, and 3755, based on conduct or violations separate from the conviction addressed in this section.SEC. 6. Section 3762 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3762. (a) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit, preclude, or otherwise interfere with the practices of other licensed personnel in carrying out authorized and customary duties and functions.(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following are not considered the practice of respiratory care:(1) Documenting observations and gathering and reporting data to another health care provider, without analysis, interpretation, or independent clinical decisionmaking.(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1399.365 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, a service or task requiring a license issued under this division if it does not involve either of the following:(i) Any task or service defined as respiratory care pursuant to Section 3702, 3702.5, or 3702.7, except as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2860 or in paragraph (1).(ii) Any task requiring respiratory assessment at the time of the task.(B) For purpose of this paragraph, “respiratory assessment” means conducting analysis to make recommendations concerning the respiratory management, diagnosis, treatment, or care of a patient or as a means to perform any task in regard to the respiratory care of a patient.SEC. 5.SEC. 7. Section 3765 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3765. (a) This act does not prohibit any of the following activities:(1) The performance of respiratory care that is an integral part of the program of study by students enrolled in approved respiratory therapy training programs.(2) Self-care by the patient or the gratuitous care by a friend or member of the family who does not represent or hold themselves out to be a respiratory care practitioner licensed under the provisions of this chapter.(3) The respiratory care practitioner from performing advances in the art and techniques of respiratory care learned through formal or specialized training.(4) The performance of respiratory care in an emergency situation by paramedical personnel who have been formally trained in these modalities and are duly licensed under the provisions of an act pertaining to their specialty.(5) Temporary performance, by other health care personnel, students, or groups, of respiratory care services, as identified and authorized by the board, in the event of an epidemic, pandemic, public disaster, or emergency.(6) Persons from engaging in cardiopulmonary research.(7) Formally trained licensees and staff of child day care facilities from administering to a child inhaled medication as defined in Section 1596.798 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) The performance by a person employed by a home medical device retail facility or by a home health agency licensed by the State Department of Public Health of specific, limited, and basic respiratory care or respiratory care-related services that have been authorized by the board.(9) The performance, by a vocational nurse licensed by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, of respiratory tasks and services identified by the board, if the licensed vocational nurse complies with all of the following:(A) Before January 1, 2028, the licensed vocational nurse has completed patient-specific training satisfactory to their employer and before the provision of patient care.(B) On or after January 1, 2028, the licensed vocational nurse has completed both of the following, in accordance with guidelines that shall be promulgated by the board in collaboration with the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California. California:(i) The licensed vocational nurse has completed task-specific training on each respiratory task or service the licensed vocational nurse will perform. This training may be provided by the employer directly or through the California Association of Medical Product Suppliers (CAMPS), the California Society for Respiratory Care (CSRC), or another organization identified by the board.(ii) The licensed vocational nurse has completed patient-specific training provided by their employer.(C) The licensed vocational nurse performs respiratory care tasks and services, as identified by the board, and, pursuant to this paragraph, in any of the following settings:(i) At a congregate living health facility, intermediate care facility designated as 15 beds or fewer, adult day health care center, pediatric day health and respite care facility, hospice agency, hospice facility, or home health agency, licensed by the State Department of Public Health.(ii) At a small family home, adult residential facility, adult residential facility for persons with special health care needs, group home, group home for children with special health care needs, enhanced behavioral supports home, community crisis home, residential care facility for the elderly, residential care facility for the chronically ill, adult day program, or therapeutic day services facility, licensed by the State Department of Social Services.(iii) At a medical foster home for veterans approved by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.(iv) As a private duty nurse as part of daily transportation and activities outside a patient’s residence or family respite for home- and community-based patients.(v) As an individual nurse provider working in a residential home.(vi) As part of services provided through a family home agency, as defined in Section 4689.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(vii) As part of supported living services provided pursuant to Section 4689 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(10) The performance of suctioning and other basic respiratory tasks and services by a vocational nurse licensed by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California under the supervision of a credentialed school nurse in accordance with Sections 49423.5 and 49426.5 of the Education Code.(b) For purposes of this section, “employer” means a person, agency, facility, organization, or entity responsible for assigning, directing, or coordinating the care provided by the licensed vocational nurse. “Employer” includes, where applicable, a family member or legal guardian authorized under the patient’s plan of care to perform that function.SEC. 6.SEC. 8. Section 3775 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3775. The amount of fees provided in connection with licenses or approvals for the practice of respiratory care shall be as follows:(a) The application fee shall be established by the board at not more than three hundred dollars ($300).(b) The application fee for the applicant under subdivision (c) of Section 3740 shall be established by the board at not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350).(c) The fees for any examination or reexamination required by the board shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering each examination or reexamination.(d) The renewal fee shall be established at three hundred thirty dollars ($330). The board may increase the renewal fee, by regulation, to an amount not to exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).(e) The delinquency fee shall be established by the board at not more than the following amounts:(1) If the license is renewed not more than two years from the date of its expiration, the delinquency fee shall be 100 percent of the renewal fee in effect at the time or renewal.(2) If the license is renewed after two years, but not more than three years, from the date of expiration of the license, the delinquency fee shall be 200 percent of the renewal fee in effect at the time of renewal.(f) The duplicate license fee shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).(g) The endorsement fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).(h) Costs incurred by the board in order to obtain and review documents or information related to the criminal history of, rehabilitation of, disciplinary actions taken by another state agency against, or acts of negligence in the practice of respiratory care by, an applicant or licensee, shall be paid by the applicant or licensee before a license will be issued or a subsequent renewal processed.(i) Fees paid in any form other than check, money order, or cashier’s check shall be subject to an additional processing charge equal to the board’s actual processing costs.(j) Fees incurred by the board to process return mail shall be paid by the applicant or licensee for whom the charges were incurred.(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board, in its discretion, may reduce the amount of any fee otherwise prescribed by this section.